test/src/older-gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-mowew_gt-norm.yaml
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: mowimak # SET IV
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: mowimat
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: mowimâyâhk
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: mowimâyahk
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: mowimâyêk
     
     
     
     
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: mowit # SET I inv
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: mowisk
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: mowikoyâhk
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: mowikoyahk
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: mowikoyêk

     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: mowicik # SET I-Pl inv
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: mowiskik
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: mowikoyâhkik
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: mowikoyahkok
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: mowikoyêkok

     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: mowitân # SET II inv
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: mowitâhk
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: mowitakok

     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: mowikot # SET III inv
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: mowikocik
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: mowikoyit
          
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: mowimit # SET IV inv
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: mowimisk
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [mowikoyâhk, mowikowâyâhk]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [mowikoyêk, mowikowâyêk]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [mowikoyahk, mowikowâyahk]




     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: mow
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: mowâtân
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: mowihk
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: mowik
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: mowâtânik
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: mowihkik

     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: mowâhkan
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: mowâhkahk
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: mowâhkêk
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: mowâhkanik
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: mowâhkahkok
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: mowâhkêkok

     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: mowin
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: mowinân
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: mowik
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: mowîhkan
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: mowîhkâhk
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: mowîhkêk
     
     
     
     

     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO: mowaki # 1 and 2-3Sg
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO: mowaci
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO: mowâyâhki
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO: [mowâyahko, mowâyahki]
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO: mowâyêko

     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: mowâci # 3-4, 4-5
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: mowâtwâwi
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: mowâyici
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO: mowakwâwi # 1 and 2-3Pl
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO: mowatwâwi
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO: mowâyâhkwâwi
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO: mowâyahkwâwi
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO: mowâyêkwâwi

     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1SgO: mowici # 1 and 2-3Sg INVERSE (3Sg-1 and 2)
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2SgO: mowiski
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO: mowikoyâhki
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO: [mowikoyahko, mowikoyahki]
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO: mowikoyêko
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: mowikoci # 3-4, 4-5 INVERSE (4-3, 5-4)
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: mowikotwâwi 
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: mowikoyici
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1SgO: mowitwâwi # 1 and 2-3Pl INVERSE (3Pl-1 and 2)
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2SgO: mowiskwâwi
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1PlO: mowikoyâhkwâwi
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12PlO: mowikoyahkwâwi
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2PlO: mowikoyêkwâwi
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1SgO: mowiyani # Local sets (2-1) Okimāsis 117
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1SgO: mowiyêko
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: mowiyâhki
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2SgO: mowitâni # Local sets INV (1-2) Okimāsis 117
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2PlO: mowitako
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: mowitâhki
